California statutes. Commercial Code
(2) It purports to delete all secured parties of record and fails to provide the name of a new secured party of record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9513.

(a) A secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to file a termination statement for the financing statement if the financing statement covers consumer goods and either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) There is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value.

(2) The debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

(b) To comply with
 subdivision (a), a secured party shall cause the secured party of record to file the termination statement in accordance with either of the following rules:

(1) Within one month after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value.

(2) If earlier, within 20 days after the secured party receives a signed demand from a debtor.

(c) In cases not governed by subdivision (a), within 20 days after a secured party receives a signed demand from a debtor, the secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to send to the debtor a termination statement for the financing statement or file the
 termination statement in the filing office if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) Except in the case of a financing statement covering accounts or chattel paper that has been sold or goods that are the subject of a consignment, there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value.

(2) The financing statement covers accounts or chattel paper that has been sold but as to which the account debtor or other person obligated has discharged its obligation.

(3) The financing statement covers goods that were the subject of a consignment to the debtor but are not in the debtor’s possession.

(4) The debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9510, upon the filing of a termination statement with the filing office, the financing statement to which the termination statement relates ceases to be effective. Except as otherwise provided in Section 9510, for purposes of subdivision (g) of Section 9519, subdivision (a) of Section 9522, and subdivision (c) of Section 9523, the filing with the filing office of a termination statement relating to a financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a transmitting utility also causes the effectiveness of the financing statement to lapse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 60.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9514.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), an initial financing statement may reflect an assignment of all of the secured party’s power to authorize an amendment to the financing statement by providing the name and mailing address of the assignee as the name and address of the secured party.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), a secured party of record may assign all or part of its power to authorize an amendment to a financing
 statement by filing in the filing office an amendment of the financing statement which does all of the following:

(1) Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates.

(2) Provides the name of the assignor.

(3) Provides the name and mailing address of the assignee.

(c) An assignment of record of a security interest in a fixture covered by a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under subdivision (c) of Section 9502 may be made only by an assignment of record of the mortgage in the manner provided by law of this state other than the Uniform Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9515.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b), (e), (f), and (g), a filed financing statement is effective for a period of five years after the date of filing.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (e), (f), and (g), an initial financing statement filed in connection with a public finance transaction or manufactured home
 transaction is effective for a period of 30 years after the date of filing if it indicates that it is filed in connection with a public finance transaction or manufactured home transaction.

(c) The effectiveness of a filed financing statement lapses on the expiration of the period of its effectiveness unless before the lapse a continuation statement is filed pursuant to subdivision (d). Upon lapse, a financing statement ceases to be effective and any security interest or agricultural lien that was perfected by the financing statement becomes unperfected, unless the security interest is perfected otherwise. If the security interest or agricultural lien becomes unperfected upon lapse, it is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

(d) A continuation statement may be filed only within six months before the expiration of the five-year
 period specified in subdivision (a) or the 30-year period specified in subdivision (b), whichever is applicable.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9510, upon timely filing of a continuation statement, the effectiveness of the initial financing statement continues for a period of five years commencing on the day on which the financing statement would have become ineffective in the absence of the filing. Upon the expiration of the five-year period, the financing statement lapses in the same manner as provided in subdivision (c), unless, before the lapse, another continuation statement is filed pursuant to subdivision (d). Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the initial financing statement.

(f) If a debtor is a transmitting utility and a filed initial financing statement so indicates, the financing statement is
 effective until a termination statement is filed.

(g) A record of a mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under subdivision (c) of Section 9502 remains effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 18.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9516.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), communication of a record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the record by the filing office constitutes filing.

(b) Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because of any of the following:

(1) The record is not communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing office.

(2) An amount equal to or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered.

(3) The filing office is unable to index the record because of any of the following:

(A) In the case of an initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor.

(B) In the case of an amendment or information statement, either of the following applies with respect to the record:

(i) It does not identify the initial financing statement as required by Section 9512 or 9518, as applicable.

(ii) It identifies an initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under Section 9515.

(C) In the case of an initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor’s surname.

(D) In the case of a record filed or recorded in the filing office described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, the record does not provide a sufficient description of the real property to which it relates.

(4) In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of record, the
 record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record.

(5) In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the record does not do any of the following:

(A) Provide a mailing address for the debtor.

(B) Indicate whether the name provided as the name of the debtor is the name of an individual or an organization.

(6) In the case of an assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under subdivision (a) of Section 9514 or an amendment filed under subdivision (b) of Section 9514, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the assignee.

(7) In the case of a continuation statement, the record is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 9515.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), both of the following rules apply:

(1) A record does not provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the information.

(2) A record that does not indicate that it is an amendment or identify an initial financing statement to which it relates, as required by Section 9512, 9514, or 9518, is an initial financing statement.

(d) A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set forth in
 subdivision (b), is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance upon the absence of the record from the files.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 19.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9517.

The failure of the filing office to index a record correctly does not affect the effectiveness of the filed record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9518.

(a) A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record indexed there under the person’s name if the person believes that the record is inaccurate or was wrongfully filed.

(b) An information statement filed under subdivision (a) shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the record to which it relates by both of the following:

(A) The file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

(B) If the information statement relates to a record filed or recorded in a filing office described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, the date that the initial financing statement was filed or recorded, and the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 9502.

(2) Indicate that it is an information statement.

(3) Provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record is inaccurate and indicate the manner in which the person believes the record should be amended to cure any inaccuracy or provide the basis
 for the person’s belief that the record was wrongfully filed.

(c) A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record filed there if the person is a secured party of record with respect to the financing statement to which the record relates and believes that the person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under subdivision (d) of Section 9509.

(d) An information statement filed under subdivision (c) shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the record to which it relates by both of the following:

(A) The file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

(B) If the information statement relates to a record
 filed or recorded in a filing office described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, the date that the initial financing statement was filed or recorded and the information specified in subdivision (b) of Section 9502.

(2) Indicate that it is an information statement.

(3) Provide the basis for the person’s belief that the person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under subdivision (d) of Section 9509.

(e) The filing of an information statement does not affect the effectiveness of an initial financing statement or other filed record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 20.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

9519.

(a) For each record filed in a filing office, the filing office shall do all of the following:

(1) Assign a unique number to the filed record.

(2) Create a record that bears the number assigned to the filed record and the date and time of filing.

(3) Maintain the filed record for public inspection.

(4) Index the filed record in accordance with subdivisions (c), (d), and (e).

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (i), a file number assigned after January 1, 2002, must include a digit that:

(1) Is mathematically derived from or related to the other digits of the file number.

(2) Aids the filing office in determining whether a number communicated as the file number includes a single-digit or transpositional error.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), the filing office shall do both of the following:

(1) Index an initial
 financing statement according to the name of the debtor and index all filed records relating to the initial financing statement in a manner that associates with one another an initial financing statement and all filed records relating to the initial financing statement.

(2) Index a record that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates also according to the name that was not previously provided.

(d) If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, it must be recorded and the filing office shall index it in accordance with both of the following rules:

(1) Under the names of the debtor and of each owner of record shown on the financing statement as if they were the mortgagors under a
 mortgage of the real property described.

(2) To the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing of records of mortgages under the name of the mortgagee, under the name of the secured party as if the secured party were the mortgagee thereunder, or, if indexing is by description, as if the financing statement were a record of a mortgage of the real property described.

(e) If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, the filing office shall index an assignment filed under subdivision (a) of Section 9514 or an amendment filed under subdivision (b) of Section 9514 in accordance with both of the following rules:

(1) Under the name of the assignor as grantor.

(2) To the extent that the
 law of this state provides for indexing a record of the assignment of a mortgage under the name of the assignee, under the name of the assignee.

(f) The filing office shall maintain a capability to do both of the following:

(1) Retrieve a record by the name of the debtor and by either of the following:

(A) If the filing office is described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the date that the record was filed or recorded.

(B) If the filing office is described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

(2) Associate and retrieve with one another an initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

(g) The filing office may not remove a debtor’s name from the index until one year after the effectiveness of a financing statement naming the debtor lapses under Section 9515 with respect to all secured parties of record.

(h) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (i), the filing office shall perform the acts required by subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule, but not later than two business days after the filing office receives the record in question.

(i) Subdivisions (b) and (h) do not apply to a filing office described in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 9501.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9520.

(a) A filing office shall refuse to accept a record for filing for a reason set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 9516 and may refuse to accept a record for filing only for a reason set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 9516.

(b) If a filing office refuses to accept a record for filing, it shall communicate to the person that presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been filed had the
 filing office accepted it. The communication shall be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule, but in the case of a filing office described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, in no event more than two business days after the filing office receives the record.

(c) A filed financing statement satisfying subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9502 is effective, even if the filing office is required to refuse to accept it for filing under subdivision (a). However, Section 9338 applies to a filed financing statement providing information described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 9516 which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

(d) If a record communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to more than one debtor, this chapter applies as to each debtor separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9521.

(a) A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written initial financing statement in the following form and format except for a reason set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 9516:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The UCC Financing Statement 
 form appears in the hard-copy publication of the chaptered bill. 
 See Sec. 21, Chapter 531 (pp. 30–31), Statutes of 2013. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * (b) A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written record in the following form and format except for a reason set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 9516:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The UCC Financing Statement 
 Amendment form appears in the hard-copy publication of the 
 chaptered bill. See Sec. 21, Chapter 531 (pp. 33–34), Statutes of 2013. 

* * * *
 * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 21.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text.  The UCC Financing Statement forms appear in Ch. 531 on pages 30 to 31 and 33 to 34.)
-------------------------------------------

9522.

(a) The filing office shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed financing statement for at least one year after the effectiveness of the financing statement has lapsed under Section 9515 with respect to all secured parties of record. The record shall be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and either of the following:

(1) If the record was filed or recorded in a filing office described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of
 Section 9501, by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates and the date the record was filed or recorded.

(2) If the record was filed in a filing office described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501, by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

(b) Except to the extent that a statute governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office immediately may destroy any written record evidencing a financing statement. However, if the filing office destroys a written record, it shall maintain another record of the financing statement which complies with subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9523.

(a) If a person that files a written record requests an acknowledgment of the filing, the filing office shall send to the person an image of the record showing the number assigned to the record pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9519 and the date and time of the filing of the record. However, if the person furnishes a copy of the record to the filing office, the filing office may instead do both of the following:

(1) Note upon the
 copy the number assigned to the record pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9519 and the date and time of the filing of the record.

(2) Send the copy to the person.

(b) If a person files a record other than a written record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment that provides all of the following information:

(1) The information in the record.

(2) The number assigned to the record pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9519.

(3) The date and time of the filing of the record.

(c) The filing office shall communicate or otherwise make available in a record all of
 the following information to any person that requests it:

(1) Whether there is on file on a date and time specified by the filing office, but not a date earlier than three business days before the filing office receives the request, any financing statement that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(A) It designates a particular debtor or, if the request so states, designates a particular debtor at the address specified in the request.

(B) It has not lapsed under Section 9515 with respect to all secured parties of record.

(C) If the request so states, it has lapsed under Section 9515 and a record of which is maintained by the filing office under subdivision (a) of Section 9522.

(2) The date and time of filing of each financing statement.

(3) The information provided in each financing statement.

(d) In complying with its duty under subdivision (c), the filing office may communicate information in any medium. However, if requested, the filing office shall communicate information by issuing its written certificate.

(e) The filing office described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501 shall perform the acts required by subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule, but not later than two business days after the filing office receives the request.

(f) At least weekly, the filing office described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 9501 shall
 offer to sell or license to the public on a nonexclusive basis, in bulk, copies of all records filed in it under this chapter, in every medium from time to time available to the filing office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9524.

Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by this chapter is excused if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office.

(2) The
 filing office exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9525.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), the fee for filing and indexing a record under this chapter is set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 12194 of the Government Code.

(b) The number of names required to be indexed does not affect the amount of the fee in subdivision (a).

(c) The
 fee for responding to a request for information from the filing office, including for issuing a certificate showing whether there is on file any financing statement naming a particular debtor, is as follows:

(1) Ten dollars ($10) if the request is communicated in writing.

(2) Five dollars ($5) if the request is communicated by another medium authorized by a rule adopted by the filing office.

(d) This section does not require a fee with respect to a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut under subdivision (c) of Section 9502. However, the recording and satisfaction fees that otherwise would be applicable to the record of the mortgage apply.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Stats. 2000, Ch. 1003, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

9526.

(a) The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish rules to implement this division. The filing-office rules shall be consistent with this division.

(b) To keep the filing-office rules and practices of the filing office in harmony with the rules and practices of filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this chapter, and to keep the technology used by the filing office compatible with the technology used by filing offices in other
 jurisdictions that enact substantially this chapter, the Secretary of State, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this division, in adopting, amending, and repealing filing-office rules, shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult with filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this chapter.

(2) Consult the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Corporate Administrators or any successor organization.

(3) Take into consideration the rules and practices of, and the technology used by, filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9526.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Official filing” means the permanent archival filing of all instruments, papers, records, and attachments as accepted for filing by a filing office.

(2) “Public filing” means a filing that is an exact copy of an official filing except that any social security number contained in the copied filing is truncated. The public filing
 shall have the same legal force and effect as the official filing.

(3) “Truncate” means to redact at least the first five digits of a social security number.

(4) “Truncated social security number” means a social security number that displays no more than the last four digits of the number.

(b) For every filing containing an untruncated social security number filed before August 1, 2007, a filing office shall create a public filing.

(c) A filing office shall post a notice on its Internet Web site informing filers not to include social security numbers in any portion of their filings. A filing office’s online filing system shall not contain a field requesting a social security number.

(d) Beginning August 1, 2007, for every filing containing an untruncated social security number filed by means other than the filing office’s Internet Web site, a filing office shall create a public filing.

(e) When a public filing version of an official filing exists, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Upon a request for inspection, copying, or other public disclosure of an official filing that is not exempt from disclosure, a filing office shall make available only the public filing version of that filing.

(2) A filing office shall publicly disclose an official filing only in response to a subpoena or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(3) This article does not restrict, delay, or modify access to an official filing, or
 modify existing agreements regarding access to an official filing, prior to the creation and availability of a public filing version of that official filing.

(f) A filing office shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section and shall not be liable for failure to truncate a social security number if the office uses due diligence to locate social security numbers in official records and truncate the social security numbers in the public filing version of those official filings. The use of an automated program with a high rate of accuracy shall be deemed to be due diligence.

(g) In the event that a filing office fails to truncate a social security number contained in a record pursuant to subdivision (b) or (d), a person may request that the filing office truncate the social security number contained in that record. Notwithstanding that a filing office may
 be deemed to be in compliance with this section pursuant to subdivision (f), a filing office that receives a request that identifies the exact location of an untruncated social security number that is required to be truncated pursuant to subdivision (b) or (d) within a specifically identified record, shall truncate that number within 10 business days of receiving the request. The public filing with the truncated social security number shall replace the record with the untruncated number.

(h) The Secretary of State shall not produce or make available financing statements in the form and format described in Section 9521 that provide a space identified for the disclosure of the social security number of an individual.

(i) The Secretary of State shall produce and make available financing statements in the form and format described in Section 9521, except that the financing statements
 shall not provide a space identified for the disclosure of the social security number of an individual.

(j) This section does not apply to a county recorder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9528.

Upon the request of any person, the Secretary of State shall issue a combined certificate showing the information as to financing statements as specified in Section 9523, the information as to state
 tax liens as specified in Section 7226 of the Government Code, the information as to attachment liens as specified in Sections 488.375 and 488.405 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the information as to judgment liens as specified in Section 697.580 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and the information as to federal liens as specified in Section 2103 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Addition and amendment operative July 1, 2001, pursuant to Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 75, and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Default [9601. - 9629.]

9601.

(a) After default, a secured party has the rights provided in this chapter and, except as otherwise provided in Section 9602, those rights provided by agreement of the parties. A secured party may do both of the following:

(1) Reduce a claim to judgment, foreclose, or otherwise enforce the claim, security interest, or agricultural lien by any available judicial procedure.

(2) If the collateral is documents, proceed either as to the documents or as to the goods they cover.

(b) A secured party in possession of collateral or control
 of collateral under Section 7106, 9104, 9105, 9105.1, 9106, 9107, or 9107.1 has the rights and duties provided in Section 9207.

(c) The rights under subdivisions (a) and (b) are cumulative and may be exercised simultaneously.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g) and in Section 9605, after default, a debtor and an obligor have the rights provided in this chapter and by agreement of the parties.

(e) If a secured party has reduced its claim to judgment, the lien of any levy that may be made upon the collateral by virtue of an execution based upon the judgment relates back to the earliest of any of the
 following:

(1) The date of perfection of the security interest or agricultural lien in the collateral.

(2) The date of filing a financing statement covering the collateral.

(3) Any date specified in a statute under which the agricultural lien was created.

(f) A sale pursuant to an execution is a foreclosure of the security interest or agricultural lien by judicial procedure within the meaning of this section. A secured party may purchase at the sale and thereafter hold the collateral free of any other requirements of this division.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of Section 9607,
 this part imposes no duties upon a secured party that is a consignor or is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 61.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 9624, to the extent that they give rights to a debtor or obligor and impose duties on a secured party, the debtor or obligor may not waive or vary the rules stated in the following listed sections:

(1) Subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 9207, which deals with use and operation of the collateral by the secured party.

(2) Section 9210, which deals
 with requests for an accounting and requests concerning a list of collateral and statement of account.

(3) Subdivision (c) of Section 9607, which deals with collection and enforcement of collateral.

(4) Subdivision (a) of Section 9608 and subdivision (c) of Section 9615 to the extent that they deal with application or payment of noncash proceeds of collection, enforcement, or disposition.

(5) Subdivision (a) of Section 9608 and subdivision (d) of Section 9615 to the extent that they require accounting for or payment of surplus proceeds of collateral.

(6) Section 9609 to the extent that it imposes upon a secured party that takes possession of collateral without judicial process the duty to do so without breach of the peace.

(7) Subdivision (b) of Section 9610, and Sections 9611, 9613, and 9614, which deal with disposition of collateral.

(8) Subdivision (f) of Section 9615, which deals with calculation of a deficiency or surplus when a disposition is made to the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor.

(9) Section 9616, which deals with explanation of the calculation of a surplus or deficiency.

(10) Section 9620, 9621, and 9622, which deal with acceptance of collateral in satisfaction of obligation.

(11) Section 9623, which deals with redemption of collateral.

(12) Section 9624, which deals with permissible
 waivers.

(13) Sections 9625 and 9626, which deal with the existence of a deficiency and with the secured party’s liability for failure to comply with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9603.

(a) The parties may determine by agreement the standards measuring the fulfillment of the rights of a debtor or obligor and the duties of a secured party under a rule stated in Section 9602 if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the duty under Section 9609 to refrain from breaching the peace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991 and Section 9701.)
-------------------------------------------

9604.

(a) If an obligation secured by a security interest in personal property or fixtures is also secured by an interest in real property or an estate therein:

(1) The secured party may do any of the following:

(A) Proceed, in any sequence, (i) in accordance with the secured party’s rights and remedies in respect of real property as to the real property security, and (ii) in accordance with this
 chapter as to the personal property or fixtures.

(B) Proceed in any sequence, as to both, some, or all of the real property and some or all of the personal property or fixtures in accordance with the secured party’s rights and remedies in respect of the real property, by including the portion of the personal property or fixtures selected by the secured party in the judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure of the real property in accordance with the procedures applicable to real property. In proceeding under this subparagraph, (i) no provision of this chapter other than this subparagraph, subparagraph (C) of paragraph (4), and paragraphs (7) and (8) shall apply to any aspect of the foreclosure; (ii) a power of sale under the deed of trust or mortgage shall be exercisable with respect to both the real property and the personal property or fixtures being sold; and (iii) the sale may be conducted by the mortgagee under the mortgage or by the trustee
 under the deed of trust. The secured party shall not be deemed to have elected irrevocably to proceed as to both real property and personal property or fixtures as provided in this subparagraph with respect to any particular property, unless and until that particular property actually has been disposed of pursuant to a unified sale (judicial or nonjudicial) conducted in accordance with the procedures applicable to real property, and then only as to the property so sold.
